Illinois, session 104th, SB3497.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 9-224, 9-225, and 9-229 and by adding Section 9-224.1 6as follows: 7    (220 ILCS 5/9-224)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 9-224)8    Sec. 9-224. The Commission shall not consider as an 9expense of any public utility company, for the purpose of 10determining any rate or charge, any amount expended for 11political activity or lobbying, as defined in the Lobbyist 12Registration Act, and any amount expended for contributions to 13a trade association or a chamber of commerce.14(Source: P.A. 84-617.) 15    (220 ILCS 5/9-224.1 new)16    Sec. 9-224.1. Amounts expended by public utilities for 17director and officer liability insurance and fiduciary 18liability insurance. The Commission shall not consider as an 19expense of any public utility company, for the purpose of 20determining any rate or charge, any amount expended by a 21public utility for director and officer liability insurance 22and fiduciary liability insurance. In determining whether the   SB3497- 2 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1purchase of other types of insurance by the public utility is 2recoverable, the Commission shall determine whether the 3specific type of insurance is of financial benefit to the 4public utility's ratepayers or the public utility's 5shareholders. If the Commission determines that the insurance 6purchased by the public utility is beneficial to its 7shareholders, then the purchase of the insurance shall not be 8a recoverable expense. 9    (220 ILCS 5/9-225)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 9-225)10    Sec. 9-225. (1) For the purposes of this Section:11        (a) "Advertising" means the commercial use, by an 12    electric, gas, water, or sewer utility, of any media, 13    including newspapers, printed matter, radio and 14    television, in order to transmit a message to a 15    substantial number of members of the public or to such 16    utility's consumers;17        (b) "Political advertising" means any advertising for 18    the purpose of influencing public opinion with respect to 19    legislative, administrative or electoral matters, or with 20    respect to any controversial issue of public importance;21        (c) "Promotional advertising" means any advertising 22    for the purpose of encouraging any person to select or use 23    the service or additional service of a utility or the 24    selection or installation of any appliance or equipment 25    designed to use such utility's service; and  SB3497- 3 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1        (d) "Goodwill or institutional advertising" means any 2    advertising either on a local or national basis designed 3    primarily to bring the utility's name before the general 4    public in such a way as to improve the image of the utility 5    or to promote controversial issues for the utility or the 6    industry.7    (2) In any general rate increase requested by any gas, 8electric, water, or sewer utility company under the provisions 9of this Act, the Commission shall not consider, for the 10purpose of determining any rate, charge, or classification of 11costs, any direct or indirect expenditures for promotional, 12political, or goodwill or institutional or goodwill 13advertising, unless the Commission finds the advertising to be 14in the best interest of the Consumer or authorized as provided 15pursuant to subsection (3) 3 of this Section.16    (3) The following categories of advertising shall be 17considered allowable operating expenses for gas, electric, 18water, or sewer utilities:19        (a) Advertising which informs consumers how they can 20    conserve energy or water, reduce peak demand for electric 21    or gas energy, or reduce demand for water;22        (b) Advertising required by law or regulations, 23    including advertising required under Part I of Title II of 24    the National Energy Conservation Policy Act;25        (c) Advertising regarding service interruptions, 26    safety measures or emergency conditions;  SB3497- 4 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1        (d) Advertising concerning employment opportunities 2    with such utility;3        (e) Advertising which promotes the use of energy 4    efficient appliances, equipment or services;5        (f) Explanations of existing or proposed rate 6    schedules or notifications of hearings thereon;7        (g) Advertising that identifies the location and 8    operating hours of company business offices;9        (h) Advertising which promotes the shifting of demand 10    from peak to off-peak hours or which encourages the 11    off-peak usage of the service; and12        (i) "Other" categories of advertisements not 13    includable in paragraphs (a) through (h), but which are 14    not political, promotional, institutional or goodwill 15    advertisements.16    (4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this 17Section, goodwill or institutional advertising shall not be a 18recoverable expense. 19(Source: P.A. 95-814, eff. 8-13-08.) 20    (220 ILCS 5/9-229)21    Sec. 9-229. Consideration of attorney and expert 22compensation as an expense and the Consumer Intervenor 23Compensation Fund intervenor compensation fund. 24    (a) The Commission shall deem as a nonrecoverable expense 25by a public utility specifically assess the justness and   SB3497- 5 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1reasonableness of any amount expended by a public utility to 2compensate attorneys or technical experts to prepare and 3litigate a general rate case filing. This issue shall be 4expressly addressed in the Commission's final order.5    (b) The State of Illinois shall create a Consumer 6Intervenor Compensation Fund subject to the following:7        (1) Provision of compensation for Consumer Interest 8    Representatives that intervene in Illinois Commerce 9    Commission proceedings will increase public engagement, 10    encourage additional transparency, expand the information 11    available to the Commission, and improve decision-making.12        (2) As used in this Section, "Consumer interest 13    representative" means:14            (A) a residential utility customer or group of 15        residential utility customers represented by a 16        not-for-profit group or organization registered with 17        the Illinois Attorney General under the Solicitation 18        for Charity Act;19            (B) representatives of not-for-profit groups or 20        organizations whose membership is limited to 21        residential utility customers; or22            (C) representatives of not-for-profit groups or 23        organizations whose membership includes Illinois 24        residents and that address the community, economic, 25        environmental, or social welfare of Illinois 26        residents, except government agencies or intervenors   SB3497- 6 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1        specifically authorized by Illinois law to participate 2        in Commission proceedings on behalf of Illinois 3        consumers.4        (3) A consumer interest representative is eligible to 5    receive compensation from the Consumer Intervenor 6    Compensation Fund consumer intervenor compensation fund if 7    its participation included lay or expert testimony or 8    legal briefing and argument concerning the expenses, 9    investments, rate design, rate impact, or other matters 10    affecting the pricing, rates, costs or other charges 11    associated with utility service, the Commission adopts a 12    material recommendation related to a significant issue in 13    the docket, and participation caused a significant 14    financial hardship to the participant; however, no 15    consumer interest representative shall be eligible to 16    receive an award pursuant to this Section if the consumer 17    interest representative receives any compensation, 18    funding, or donations, directly or indirectly, from 19    parties that have a financial interest in the outcome of 20    the proceeding.21        (4) Within 30 days after September 15, 2021 (the 22    effective date of Public Act 102-662), each utility that 23    files a request for an increase in rates under Article IX 24    or Article XVI shall deposit an amount equal to one half of 25    the rate case attorney and expert expense allowed by the 26    Commission, but not to exceed $500,000, into the fund   SB3497- 7 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    within 35 days of the date of the Commission's final Order 2    in the rate case or 20 days after the denial of rehearing 3    under Section 10-113 of this Act, whichever is later. The 4    Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund shall be used to 5    provide payment to consumer interest representatives as 6    described in this Section, and the amount deposited into 7    the Fund by a public utility shall not be a recoverable 8    expense.9        (5) An electric public utility with 3,000,000 or more 10    retail customers shall contribute $450,000 to the Consumer 11    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 12    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 13    102-662). A combined electric and gas public utility 14    serving fewer than 3,000,000 but more than 500,000 retail 15    customers shall contribute $225,000 to the Consumer 16    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 17    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 18    102-662). A gas public utility with 1,500,000 or more 19    retail customers that is not a combined electric and gas 20    public utility shall contribute $225,000 to the Consumer 21    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 22    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 23    102-662). A gas public utility with fewer than 1,500,000 24    retail customers but more than 300,000 retail customers 25    that is not a combined electric and gas public utility 26    shall contribute $80,000 to the Consumer Intervenor   SB3497- 8 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    Compensation Fund within 60 days after September 15, 2021 2    (the effective date of Public Act 102-662). A gas public 3    utility with fewer than 300,000 retail customers that is 4    not a combined electric and gas public utility shall 5    contribute $20,000 to the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 6    Fund within 60 days after September 15, 2021 (the 7    effective date of Public Act 102-662). A combined electric 8    and gas public utility serving fewer than 500,000 retail 9    customers shall contribute $20,000 to the Consumer 10    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 11    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 12    102-662). A water or sewer public utility serving more 13    than 100,000 retail customers shall contribute $80,000, 14    and a water or sewer public utility serving fewer than 15    100,000 but more than 10,000 retail customers shall 16    contribute $20,000.17        (6)(A) Prior to the entry of a Final Order in a 18    docketed case, the Commission Administrator shall provide 19    a payment to a consumer interest representative that 20    demonstrates through a verified application for funding 21    that the consumer interest representative's participation 22    or intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes 23    a significant financial hardship based on a schedule to be 24    developed by the Commission. The Administrator may require 25    verification of costs incurred, including statements of 26    hours spent, as a condition to paying the consumer   SB3497- 9 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    interest representative prior to the entry of a Final 2    Order in a docketed case.3        (B) If the Commission adopts a material recommendation 4    related to a significant issue in the docket and 5    participation caused a financial hardship to the 6    participant, then the consumer interest representative 7    shall be allowed payment for some or all of the consumer 8    interest representative's reasonable attorney's or 9    advocate's fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and other 10    reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a 11    hearing or proceeding. Expenses related to travel or meals 12    shall not be compensable.13        (C) The consumer interest representative shall submit 14    an itemized request for compensation to the Consumer 15    Intervenor Compensation Fund, including the advocate's or 16    attorney's reasonable fee rate, the number of hours 17    expended, reasonable expert and expert witness fees, and 18    other reasonable costs for the preparation for and 19    participation in the hearing and briefing within 30 days 20    of the Commission's final order after denial or decision 21    on rehearing, if any.22        (7) Administration of the Fund.23        (A) The Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund is 24    created as a special fund in the State treasury. All 25    disbursements from the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 26    Fund shall be made only upon warrants of the Comptroller   SB3497- 10 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    drawn upon the Treasurer as custodian of the Fund upon 2    vouchers signed by the Executive Director of the 3    Commission or by the person or persons designated by the 4    Director for that purpose. The Comptroller is authorized 5    to draw the warrant upon vouchers so signed. The Treasurer 6    shall accept all warrants so signed and shall be released 7    from liability for all payments made on those warrants. 8    The Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund shall be 9    administered by an Administrator that is a person or 10    entity that is independent of the Commission. The 11    administrator will be responsible for the prudent 12    management of the Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund 13    and for recommendations for the award of consumer 14    intervenor compensation from the Consumer Intervenor 15    Compensation Fund. The Commission shall issue a request 16    for qualifications for a third-party program administrator 17    to administer the Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund. 18    The third-party administrator shall be chosen through a 19    competitive bid process based on selection criteria and 20    requirements developed by the Commission. The Illinois 21    Procurement Code does not apply to the hiring or payment 22    of the Administrator. All Administrator costs may be paid 23    for using monies from the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 24    Fund, but the Program Administrator shall strive to 25    minimize costs in the implementation of the program.26        (B) The computation of compensation awarded from the   SB3497- 11 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    Fund fund shall take into consideration the market rates 2    paid to persons of comparable training and experience who 3    offer similar services, but may not exceed the comparable 4    market rate for services paid by the public utility as 5    part of its nonrecoverable rate case expense reported to 6    the Commission.7        (C)(1) Recommendations on the award of compensation by 8    the administrator shall include consideration of whether 9    the Commission adopted a material recommendation related 10    to a significant issue in the docket and whether 11    participation caused a financial hardship to the 12    participant and the payment of compensation is fair, just 13    and reasonable.14        (2) Recommendations on the award of compensation by 15    the administrator shall be submitted to the Commission for 16    approval. Unless the Commission initiates an investigation 17    within 45 days after the notice to the Commission, the 18    award of compensation shall be allowed 45 days after 19    notice to the Commission. Such notice shall be given by 20    filing with the Commission on the Commission's e-docket 21    system, and keeping open for public inspection the award 22    for compensation proposed by the Administrator. The 23    Commission shall have power, and it is hereby given 24    authority, either upon complaint or upon its own 25    initiative without complaint, at once, and if it so 26    orders, without answer or other formal pleadings, but upon   SB3497- 12 -LRB104 16328 AAS 29714 b1    reasonable notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning the 2    propriety of the award.3    (c) The Commission may adopt rules to implement this 4Section.5(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)